en: Tent Footprints
xx: Tent Footprints
cs: Stanové podlážky
da: Teltunderlag
de: Zeltunterlagen
es: Protectores de suelo para tiendas de campaña
fr: Tapis de sol pour tente
it: Protezioni a terra per tende
ja: テント用グランドシート
nl: Tentgrondzeilen
no: Teltunderlag
pl: Podłogi do namiotów
pt: Bases de barracas
ru: Дно для палаток
sv: Tältunderlag
tr: Çadır Tabanları

en: Tent Poles & Stakes
xx: Tent Poles & Stakes
cs: Stanové tyčky a kolíky
da: Teltpæle og pløkke
de: Zeltstangen & -Heringe
es: Mástiles y estacas para tiendas de campaña
fr: Mâts et piquets de tente
it: Pali e paletti per tende
ja: テント用ポール・杭
nl: Tentstokken en haringen
no: Teltstenger og -stolper
pl: Maszty i śledzie
pt: Estacas e varetas de barracas
ru: Колышки и стойки для палаток
sv: Tältstänger och tältpinnar
tr: Çadır Direk ve Kazıkları

en: Tent Vestibules
xx: Tent Vestibules
cs: Stanové předsíňky
da: Teltsejl
de: Vorzelte
es: Carpas para tiendas de campaña
fr: Espaces de rangement pour tente
it: Vestiboli per tende
ja: テント用前室
nl: Voortenten
no: Yttertelt
pl: Podłogi absydy
pt: Vestíbulos de barraca
ru: Тамбуры палаток
sv: Förtält
tr: Çadır Girişleri

en: Tents
xx: Tents
cs: Stany
da: Telte
de: Zelte
es: Tiendas de campaña
fr: Tentes
it: Tende
ja: テント
nl: Tenten
no: Telt
pl: Namioty
pt: Barracas
ru: Палатки
sv: Tält
tr: Çadırlar

en: Windbreaks
xx: Windbreaks
cs: Zástěny
da: Oversejl
de: Windschutz
es: Paravientos
fr: Pare-vents
it: Protezioni contro il vento
ja: ウインドスクリーン
nl: Windschermen
no: Vindskjermer
pl: Parawany
pt: Jaquetas corta-vento
ru: Ветрозащитные экраны
sv: Vindskydd
tr: Rüzgar Siperleri

en: Climbing
xx: Climbing
cs: Lezectví
da: Klatring
de: Klettern
es: Escalada
fr: Escalade
it: Arrampicata
ja: 登山
nl: Klimmen
no: Klatring
pl: Wspinaczka
pt: Alpinismo
ru: Скалолазание
sv: Klättring
tr: Tırmanış

en: Belay Devices
xx: Belay Devices
cs: Slaňovací pomůcky
da: Ringbolte
de: Sicherungsgeräte
es: Aseguradores
fr: Assureurs
it: Dispositivi per assicurazione
ja: 登山用確保器
nl: Zekeringshaken
no: Belay-mekanismer
pl: Przyrządy asekuracyjne
pt: Dispositivos de amarração para alpinismo
ru: Страховочные приспособления
sv: Firningsutrustning
tr: Halat Bağlama Aygıtları

en: Carabiners
xx: Carabiners
cs: Karabiny
da: Karabiner
de: Karabiner
es: Mosquetones para escalada
fr: Mousquetons, mousqueton, Mousquetons d'escalade
it: Moschettoni
ja: カラビナ
nl: Karabijnhaken
no: Karabinere
pl: Karabinki
pt: Mosquetões para alpinismo
ru: Карабины
sv: Karbiner
tr: Karabinler

en: Climbing Apparel & Accessories
xx: Climbing Apparel & Accessories
cs: Horolezecké oblečení a vybavení
da: Udstyr og tilbehør til klatring
de: Kletterbekleidung & -zubehör
es: Equipos y accesorios para escalada
fr: Équipement et accessoires d'escalade
it: Accessori e attrezzature per arrampicata
ja: 登山用装備・小物
nl: Klimkleding en -accessoires
no: Klatreklær og -tilbehør
pl: Odzież i akcesoria do wspinaczki
pt: Roupas e acessórios para escalada
ru: Снаряжение и принадлежности для скалолазания
sv: Klätterkläder och -utrustning
tr: Tırmanma Kıyafetleri ve Aksesuarları

en: Climbing Gloves
xx: Climbing Gloves
cs: Horolezecké rukavice
da: Klatrehandsker
de: Kletterhandschuhe
es: Guantes para escalada
fr: Gants d'escalade
it: Guanti per arrampicata
ja: 登山用グローブ
nl: Klimhandschoenen
no: Klatrehansker
pl: Rękawice wspinaczkowe
pt: Luvas de escalada
ru: Перчатки для скалолазания
sv: Klätterhandskar
tr: Tırmanma Eldivenleri

en: Climbing Helmets
xx: Climbing Helmets
cs: Lezecké helmy
da: Klatrehjelme
de: Kletterhelme
es: Cascos de escalada
fr: Casques d'escalade
it: Elmetti da arrampicata
ja: 登山用ヘルメット
nl: Klimhelmen
no: Klatrehjelmer
pl: Kaski wspinaczkowe
pt: Capacetes para alpinismo
ru: Защитные каски для скалолазания
sv: Klätterhjälmar
tr: Tırmanma Kaskları

en: Crampons
xx: Crampons
cs: Mačky
da: Klatrejern
de: Steigeisen
es: Crampones
fr: Crampons, Crampons de chaussures de montagne
it: Ramponi
ja: アイゼン
nl: Klimijzers
no: Stegjern
pl: Raki
pt: Crampons
ru: Альпинистские кошки
sv: Stegjärn
tr: Kramponlar

en: Climbing Ascenders & Descenders
xx: Climbing Ascenders & Descenders
cs: Stoupací a slaňovací jištění
da: Klatretaljer
de: Steigklemmen & Abseilausrüstung
es: Ascensores y descensores para escalada
fr: Bloqueurs et systèmes d'assurage pour l'escalade
it: Discensori e autobloccanti per arrampicata
ja: 登山用アセンダー・ディセンダー
nl: Stijg- en afdaalklemmen voor klimsport
no: Taubremser og -klemmer for klatring
pl: Urządzenia zaciskowe
pt: Ascensores e descensores para alpinismo
ru: Жумары и спусковые устройства для скалолазания
sv: Repbromsar och firningsåttor
tr: Tırmanma Yükselticileri ve Alçaltıcıları

en: Climbing Chalk Bags
xx: Climbing Chalk Bags
cs: Pytlíky na lezeckou křídu
da: Klatrekalkposer
de: Chalkbags
es: Bolsos de magnesio
fr: Sacs à magnésie pour l'escalade
it: Sacchetti magnesite da arrampicata
ja: 登山用チョークバッグ
nl: Klimkalktassen
no: Klatrekalkposer
pl: Woreczki na magnezję
pt: Sacos de giz para alpinismo
ru: Мешочки для магнезии
sv: Kritpåsar
tr: Tırmanış Pudra Çantaları

en: Climbing Crash Pads
xx: Climbing Crash Pads
cs: Horolezecké chrániče
da: Beskyttelsesudstyr til klatring
de: Bouldermatten
es: Colchonetas para escalada
fr: Tapis de réception pour l'escalade, Crashpad
it: Protezioni antiurto per arrampicata
ja: 登山用クラッシュパッド
nl: Valmatten voor klimsport
no: Fallunderlag for klatring
pl: Ochraniacze dla uprawiających wspinaczkę
pt: Almofadas antichoque para alpinismo
ru: Амортизирующие прокладки для скалолазания
sv: Boulderingmattor
tr: Tırmanış Minderleri

en: Climbing Harnesses
xx: Climbing Harnesses
cs: Lezecké postroje
da: Klatreseler
de: Klettergurte
es: Arneses
fr: Baudriers d'escalade
it: Imbracature
ja: 登山用ハーネス
nl: Klimharnassen
no: Klatreseler
pl: Uprzęże wspinaczkowe
pt: Arnês para alpinismo
ru: Страховочные системы
sv: Klätterselar
tr: Tırmanma Kemerleri

en: Climbing Protection Devices
xx: Climbing Protection Devices
cs: Lezecké ochranné vybavení
da: Klatrebeskyttelse
de: Kletterschutzausrüstung
es: Dispositivos de protección de escalada
fr: Dispositifs de protection pour l'escalade
it: Dispositivi di protezione da arrampicata
ja: 登山用安全装置
nl: Beschermende apparatuur voor klimmen
no: Beskyttelsesutstyr for klatring
pl: Ochraniacze wspinaczkowe
pt: Dispositivos de proteção para alpinismo
ru: Защитная экипировка для альпинизма
sv: Enheter för klättringsskydd
tr: Tırmanış Koruyucu Aygıtları

en: Climbing Rope
xx: Climbing Rope
cs: Lezecká lana
da: Klatrereb
de: Kletterseile
es: Cuerda de escalada
fr: Corde d'escalade
it: Fune da arrampicata
ja: 登山用ロープ
nl: Klimtouw
no: Klatretau
pl: Liny wspinaczkowe
pt: Corda para alpinismo
ru: Веревки для альпинизма
sv: Klättringsrep
tr: Tırmanma Halatı

en: Climbing Rope Bags
xx: Climbing Rope Bags
cs: Vaky na lezecká lana
da: Tasker til klatrereb
de: Seilsäcke
es: Mochilas para escalada
fr: Sacs à cordes d'escalade, corde, cordelette, harnais et longe de canicrosse
it: Borse funi da arrampicata
ja: 登山用ロープバッグ
nl: Tassen voor klimtouw
no: Klatretauposer
pl: Torby na liny
pt: Sacos de cordas para alpinismo
ru: Чехлы для веревок
sv: Klättringsreppåsar
tr: Tırmanma Halatı Çantaları

en: Climbing Webbing
xx: Climbing Webbing
cs: Lezecké popruhy
da: Nylonsnore til klatring
de: Gurtbänder
es: Cinta tubular
fr: Sangles d'escalade
it: Fettuccia da arrampicata
ja: 登山用ウェビング
nl: Spanbanden voor klimmen
no: Klatreliner
pl: Taśmy wspinaczkowe
pt: Cintos para alpinismo
ru: Альпинистские ленты
sv: Klättringswebbing
tr: Tırmanma Kayışları